Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 35. Military Equipment and Property

§ 821.
Repealed. 2021, No. 10, § 42.

§ 822.
Damaged or destroyed property.

When military arms, stores, uniforms, equipment, or property of any kind belonging to the State become damaged, partially or wholly unfit for use, or partially or wholly destroyed, the officer responsible for the property may request the Adjutant and Inspector General to appoint a board of inspection to examine and report as to its condition.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 43.

§ 823.
Storage of property.

Military stores belonging to the State not issued to the National Guard, and military property belonging to the United States in possession of the State and not issued to the National Guard, shall be stored in the State. The Adjutant and Inspector General shall adopt the necessary rules to secure the safekeeping of military property issued to the National Guard.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 125;

2021, No. 10

, § 44.

§ 824.
Uniforms and equipment.

The uniforms and equipment of organizations and members of the National Guard shall be as prescribed and furnished by the federal government.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 126;

2021, No. 10

, § 45.

§ 825.
Repealed.
1973, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 4, 1974.